Hawaii statutes.
[§712-1249.7] Promoting a controlled
substance through a minor. (1) A person age eighteen or over commits the
offense of promoting a controlled substance through a minor if the person
knowingly employs, hires, uses, persuades, induces, entices, or coerces a minor
to facilitate the illegal distribution of a controlled substance.

(2) The offense of promoting a controlled
substance through a minor is a class B felony unless the offense occurs in, on,
or near the real property comprising a school, school vehicles, or public parks
as prohibited under section 712-1249.6, in which case it is a class A felony.
[L 2004, c 44, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next